District of Columbia statutes.
47-2506

Payment of tax by private banks and note brokers.

The taxes for said private banks and bankers, and note brokers shall be paid to the Collector of Taxes of the District of Columbia, and shall date from the first day of July in each year and expire on the 30th day of June following. Said taxes shall date from the first day of the month in which the liability begins, and payment shall be made for a proportionate amount.

History

July 1, 1902, 32 Stat. 622, ch. 1352, § 6, par. 17
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2506.
1973 Ed., § 47-1709.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 47-401.